Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.185

Personal service out-of-state—Acts submitting person to jurisdiction of courts—Saving.

(1) Any person, whether or not a citizen or resident of this state, who in person or through an agent does any of the acts in this section enumerated, thereby submits said person, and, if an individual, his or her personal representative, to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to any cause of action arising from the doing of any of said acts:

(a) The transaction of any business within this state;

(b) The commission of a tortious act within this state;

(c) The ownership, use, or possession of any property whether real or personal situated in this state;

(d) Contracting to insure any person, property, or risk located within this state at the time of contracting;

(e) The act of sexual intercourse within this state with respect to which a child may have been conceived;

(f) Living in a marital relationship within this state notwithstanding subsequent departure from this state, as to all proceedings authorized by chapter 26.09 RCW, so long as the petitioning party has continued to reside in this state or has continued to be a member of the armed forces stationed in this state.

(2) Service of process upon any person who is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, as provided in this section, may be made by personally serving the defendant outside this state, as provided in RCW 4.28.180, with the same force and effect as though personally served within this state.

(3) Only causes of action arising from acts enumerated herein may be asserted against a defendant in an action in which jurisdiction over him or her is based upon this section.

(4) Personal service outside the state shall be valid only when an affidavit is made and filed to the effect that service cannot be made within the state.

(5) In the event the defendant is personally served outside the state on causes of action enumerated in this section, and prevails in the action, there may be taxed and allowed to the defendant as part of the costs of defending the action a reasonable amount to be fixed by the court as attorneys' fees.

(6) Nothing herein contained limits or affects the right to serve any process in any other manner now or hereafter provided by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 100; 1977 c 39 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 42 s 22; 1959 c 131 s 2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 4(e), CR 12(a), CR 82(a).

Uniform parentage act: Chapter 26.26A RCW.